en: Frozen precooked green beans, Frozen cooked French bean
fr: Haricots verts surgelés précuits, Haricots verts cuits surgelés

en: Frozen broad green beans
es: Judías verdes redondas congeladas

en: Frozen flat green beans
es: Judías verdes planas congeladas
fr: Haricots verts plats surgelés
hr: Smrznute plosnate mahune

en: Frozen chopped green beans
es: Judías verdes troceadas congeladas, Judías verdes congeladas troceadas

en: Frozen whole green beans
es: Judías verdes enteras congeladas, Judías verdes congeladas enteras

en: Frozen chopped broad green beans
es: Judías verdes redondas troceadas congeladas

en: Frozen chopped flat green beans
es: Judías verdes planas troceadas congeladas

en: Frozen whole broad green beans
es: Judías verdes redondas enteras congeladas

en: Frozen whole flat green beans
es: Judías verdes planas enteras congeladas

en: Frozen green peas, Frozen fresh peas, Frozen immature peas, Frozen garden peas
bg: Замразен зелен грах
de: Gefrorene grüne Erbsen
es: Guisantes verdes congelados, Guisantes congelados
fr: Petits pois surgelés, Pois frais surgelés
hr: Smrznuti zeleni grašak
it: Piselli congelati
nl: Diepvries doperwten

en: Frozen precooked green peas, Frozen cooked garden peas
fr: Petits pois surgelés précuits, Petits pois surgelés cuits

en: Frozen peppers
bg: Замразени чушки
da: Frosne peberfrugter
de: Gefrorener Pfeffer
es: Pimientos congelados
fr: Poivrons surgelés
hr: Smrznute paprike
nl: Diepvries paprika

en: Frozen green peppers
bg: Замразени зелени чушки
da: Frosne grønne peberfrugter
de: Gefrohrene grüne Pfeffer
es: Pimientos verdes congelados
fr: Poivrons verts surgelés
hr: Smrznute zelene paprike
nl: Diepvries groene paprika

en: Frozen red peppers
bg: Замразени червени чушки
da: Frosne røde peberfrugter
de: Gefrohrene rote Pfeffer
es: Pimientos rojos congelados
fr: Poivrons rouges congelés
hr: Smrznute crvene paprike
nl: Diepvries rode paprika

en: Frozen yellow peppers
bg: Замразени жълти чушки
da: Frosne gule peberfrugter
de: Gefrohrene gelbe Pfeffer
es: Pimientos amarillos congelados
fr: Poivrons jaunes congelés
hr: Smrznute žute paprike
nl: Diepvries gele paprika

en: Frozen mixed peppers
da: Frosne blandede pebberfrugter
de: Gefrorene Pfeffergemische
es: Mezclas de pimientos multicolores congelados
fr: Mélanges de poivrons multicolores surgelés
hr: Smrznute miješane paprike
nl: Diepvries paprikamengsels

en: Frozen potatoes
da: Frosne kartofler
de: Gefrohrene Kartoffeln
es: Patatas congeladas
fi: Perunapakasteet
fr: Pommes de terre surgelées, Pommes de terre surgelés
hr: Smrznuti krumpir
it: Patate surgelate
nl: Diepvriesaardappelen

en: Frozen potato wedges
da: Frosne kartoffelbåde
sv: Frysta potatisklyftor, Djupfryst klyftpotatis

en: Frozen cooked spiced potato chips, Frozen cooked spiced potato wedges, Frozen cooked spiced potato quarters
fr: Potatoes épicées cuites surgelées, Potatoes wedges épicées cuites surgelées, Quartiers de pommes de terre épicés cuits surgelés

en: Frozen pumpkins
de: Gefrohrene Kürbisse
es: Calabazas congeladas
fr: Citrouilles surgelées, potirons surgelés
hr: Smrznute bundeve
nl: Diepvriespompoenen